apertium-nio.nio.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for nio

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>  ! Noun
%<pl%> ! Plural
%<sg%> ! Singular

!! Nganasan in latin script :-/

+N +V +A
+Loc +Lat +Acc +Gen 
+Pl +Sg +Du
^n ^ODD

LEXICON Root
0 Nouns ;
0 Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
kotu+N:ko ko/tu__n ;

taa+N:taa Cases ;
maɂ+N:maɁ Cases ;
ńemɨ+N:ńemɨ^ODD Cases ;
ŋanduj+N:ŋandujCases ;
baarbə+N:baarbə Cases ;
čimi+N:čimi^ODD Cases ;
ŋoj+N:ŋoj Cases ;
baŋ+N:baŋ Cases ;
hüe+N:hüe^ODD Cases ;
sɨr+N:sɨr Cases ;

LEXICON Verbs

is’a+V:iXXX Persons ;


LEXICON ko/tu__n
:tu S1_Cases ; 
:ðu^ODD S2_Cases ;

+Sg+Nom:0       # ; ! S1
+Sg+Lat:%>NTƏC  # ; ! S1
+Sg+Loc:%>NTƏNU # ; ! S1
+Sg+Ela:%>KəCtə # ; ! S1
+Sg+Prl:%>mənU  # ; ! S1

LEXICON S2_Cases
+Sg+Acc:0       # ; ! S2
+Sg+Com:%>na    # ; ! S2 ! << postp suffix cf. -nkaa

LEXICON S3_Cases
+Pl+Lat:%>NTIɁ  # ; ! S3?
+Pl+Nom:%>Ɂ     # ; ! S3?
+Du+Nom:%>Kəj   # ; ! S??
+Sg+Gen:%>ƏC     # ; ! S2

LEXICON Possessives_1

+PxSg1:mə # ;
+PxDu1:gəjńə # ;

LEXICON Possessives_2

+PxSg1:nə # ;
+PxPl1:ńə # ;


!! Simbia ŋamabtusuðə           ńuəmtu           kolitəni
!!        ŋəmə+CAUS+FUT+3SG     ńua+ACC+PX3SG    kolu+LOC
!! Simbia syöttää               lapsensa         kalalla
!!        syö+CAUS+NONPAST+3SG  lapsi+ACC+PX3SG  kala+ADE

!! 
